Georgia statutes. 
Substantial compliance with notice sufficient. - Substantial compliance with the provision as to notice is sufficient, and when notice specified "Town of Louisville" instead of City of Louisville this was sufficient. Rhodes v. City of Louisville, 121 Ga. 551, 49 S.E. 681 (1904).

By what clerk notice published. - Injunction will not be granted when notice is published by the clerk of the court where the municipality is situated, on the ground that the clerk of another county where order nisi was made returnable should have published the notice. Farmer v. Mayor of Thomson, 133 Ga. 94, 65 S.E. 180 (1909).

Effect of continuance. - When it appears that the case was regularly continued by the court from the day named in the publication to the day on which the hearing was had, the fact that the hearing was on a day other than that named in the publication does not make the judgment illegal. Wimberly v. County of Twiggs, 116 Ga. 50, 42 S.E. 478 (1902); Oliver v. City of Elberton, 124 Ga. 64, 52 S.E. 15 (1905); Crawley v. State, 150 Ga. 86, 102 S.E. 898 (1920).

This section does not require teste. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

Proper date to present objection to validation. - When a judge fixed a certain date as the day for the hearing on the question of validating a proposed bond issue, and for providential reasons failed to hold court on that day but recessed it until four days later, and upon calling the case on this date a qualified objector presented an objection, it was error to refuse to allow such otherwise qualified objector to present such objections merely because the objector had not presented the objections on the date originally fixed for the hearing. Horton v. Downs Consol. Sch. Dist., 59 Ga. App. 77, 200 S.E. 469 (1938) (decided under former Code 1933, § 87-302).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 357.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-23. Hearing and judgment on show cause order; parties to proceedings; appeal.

Statute text

Within the time prescribed in the order or such further time as he may fix, the judge of the superior court shall proceed to hear and determine all questions of law and of fact in the case and shall render judgment thereon. Any citizen of this state who is a resident of the county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to issue the bonds may become a party to the proceedings at or before the time set for the hearing. Any party to the proceedings who is dissatisfied with the judgment of the court confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds or refusing to confirm and validate the issuance of the bonds may appeal from the judgment under the procedure provided by law in cases of injunction. No appeal may be taken by any person who was not a party at the time the judgment appealed from was rendered.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 447; Code 1933, § 87-304; Ga. L. 1946, p. 726, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 279, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 76, § 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Court can determine validity of votes. - In a proceeding to validate bonds, it is within the power and jurisdiction of the superior court, upon proper pleadings and sufficient evidence, to pass upon the validity of any votes cast in the election, and to eliminate such votes as are shown by the pleadings and the evidence to be illegal. Turk v. Royal, 34 Ga. App. 717, 131 S.E. 119 (1925).

Generally there can be but one action to validate either certificates or bonds; in either case all interventions would be heard in the validation proceedings, and the allegation that a declaratory judgment is necessary to avoid a multiplicity of actions is a conclusion of the pleader, contrary to the statutory provisions pertaining to validation of revenue anticipation certificates or bonds. Liner v. City of Rossville, 212 Ga. 664, 94 S.E.2d 862 (1956).

Burden on state to prove material facts. - When statutory proceedings were brought for the purpose of validating bonds under former Civil Code 1910, §§ 446 and 447 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-82-21 and 36-82-23), and were contested by citizens who became parties thereto and deny the truth of the substantial allegations of the petition, the burden was on the state to prove the material facts which were requisite to obtain validation. Harrell v. Town of Whigham, 141 Ga. 322, 80 S.E. 1010 (1914); Stephens v. School Dist. No. 3, 154 Ga. 275, 114 S.E. 197 (1922); Moody v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Ga. App. 21, 113 S.E. 103 (1922); Clay v. Austell Sch. Dist., 35 Ga. App. 109, 132 S.E. 127 (1926).

Burden of proof on state even when solicitor general (now district attorney) alleges facts sufficient to warrant validation of bonds and answers filed by defendant admits facts alleged. Harrell v. Town of Whigham, 141 Ga. 322, 80 S.E. 1010 (1914); Jennings v. New Bronwood Sch. Dist., 156 Ga. 15, 118 S.E. 560 (1923).

Final judgment prerequisite to bill of exceptions. - When an answer filed by intervenors is dismissed as being insufficient to prevent validation, but the order of dismissal provides merely that the petitioners "may take an order confirming and validating," it does not constitute a final judgment confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds from which a bill of exceptions will lie as provided by this section. Veal v. Deepstep Consol. Sch. Dist., 34 Ga. App. 67, 128 S.E. 223 (1925).

Proper date to present objection to validation. - When a judge fixed a certain date as the day for the hearing on the question of validating a proposed bond issue, and for providential reasons failed to hold court on that day but recessed the court until four days later, and upon calling the case on this date a qualified objector presented an objection, it was error to refuse to allow such otherwise qualified objector to present the objections merely because the objector had not presented the objection on the date originally fixed for the hearing. Horton v. Downs Consol. Sch. Dist., 59 Ga. App. 77, 200 S.E. 469 (1938).

Petition that judgment be reopened. - When, upon a petition duly filed praying for the validation of certain county bonds, all the proceedings appeared on their face to have been regular, including the notice provided for by law, and the court rendered a judgment validating the bonds, and, 16 days thereafter and after the court had adjourned, certain persons filed a petition merely alleging that the people were taxpayers and asking that the order validating the bonds be vacated or reopened, and that the people be heard on the question as to the regularity or irregularity of the election held to authorize the bonds, the court did not err in dismissing the petition, on the ground that it came too late. Ballard v. Morgan County, 24 Ga. App. 371, 100 S.E. 763 (1919).

Injunction refused when writ of error not timely. - After the validation of certain municipal bonds, no writ of error to the judgment validating the bonds having been sued out within the time prescribed by law, it was not error for the court below to refuse to enjoin the issuance of those bonds. Holton v. City of Camilla, 134 Ga. 560, 68 S.E. 472 (1910); Edwards v. Town of Guyton, 140 Ga. 553, 79 S.E. 195 (1913).

Assigning error as to amount. - Intervenors cannot for the first time, in their bill of exceptions, successfully assign error to the judgment on the ground that it did not affirmatively appear that the proposed bond issue was within the constitutional limitation of amount. Sewell v. City of Tallapoosa, 145 Ga. 19, 88 S.E. 577 (1916).

Judgment conforms to pleading when judgment contains same recitals. - Judgment validating bonds conformed to the pleadings upon which based, when the judgment contained the same recitals as pleadings as to character and amount of bonds raised. Sewell v. City of Tallapoosa, 145 Ga. 19, 88 S.E. 577 (1916).

Sufficiency of allegations of fraud. - When it does not appear that the county attorney made any misrepresentation as to any fact or facts concerning the hearing, or the postponement thereof, or waived the filing of any objections, or promised to continue the hearing, and it appearing from the petition that the petitioners knew of the time legally set for the validation proceeding, and the only conclusion to be drawn being that through their laches and negligence the petitioners failed to file objections, the petition does not allege facts sufficient to show such fraud as would warrant the setting aside of the judgment. Swicord v. Grady County, 24 Ga. App. 522, 101 S.E. 395 (1919).

Intervention procedure not required. - O.C.G.A. § 36-82-23 does not provide for intervention by third parties; thus, becoming a party does not require mandatory compliance with the procedure of O.C.G.A. § 9-11-24. Hay v. Development Auth., 239 Ga. App. 803, 521 S.E.2d 912 (1999), appeal dismissed sub nom. Hay v. Newton County, 246 Ga. App. 44, 538 S.E.2d 181 (2000).

Cited in Gibbs v. Ty Ty Consol. Sch. Dist., 168 Ga. 379, 147 S.E. 764 (1929); Chappell v. Small, 194 Ga. 143, 20 S.E.2d 916 (1942); Dade County v. State, 201 Ga. 241, 39 S.E.2d 473 (1946).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 369, 372.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2173 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-24. Effect of judgment of validation.

Statute text

In the event that no appeal is filed within the time prescribed by law or, if an appeal is filed, that the judgment is affirmed on appeal, the judgment of the superior court confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds shall be forever conclusive upon the validity of the bonds against the county, municipality, or political subdivision.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 448; Code 1933, § 87-305; Ga. L. 1966, p. 76, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Illegal use of funds does not relieve liability. - Fact that funds derived from sale of school bonds may have been improperly used by trustees does not relieve taxpayers from liability to innocent bondholders. Page v. Sansom, 184 Ga. 623, 192 S.E. 203 (1937).

When bonds had been duly validated, and the defendants failed to intervene in proceeding to validate bonds, the defendant's could not be heard to attack the validity of act under which bonds were issued on the ground that the act was unconstitutional. Gowran v. Wood, 171 Ga. 433, 156 S.E. 21 (1930).

Cited in Rountree v. Rentz, 119 Ga. 885, 47 S.E. 328 (1904); Baker v. City of Cartersville, 127 Ga. 221, 56 S.E. 249 (1906); Edwards v. Town of Guyton, 140 Ga. 553, 79 S.E. 195 (1913); Whiddon v. Fletcher, 150 Ga. 39, 102 S.E. 350 (1920); Dumas v. Rigdon, 151 Ga. 267, 106 S.E. 261 (1921); Towns v. Workmore Pub. Sch. Dist., 166 Ga. 393, 142 S.E. 877 (1928); Gibbs v. City of Social Circle, 191 Ga. 422, 12 S.E.2d 335 (1940).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 373 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2173.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

Rescission of vote authorizing school district or other municipal bond issue, expenditure, or tax, 68 A.L.R.2d 1041.

36-82-25. Entry of reference to judgment of validation on bonds; use of entry as evidence.

Statute text

Bonds issued under this part shall have stamped or written thereon, by the proper officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision issuing the bonds or their agents or servants, the words "Validated and confirmed by judgment of the superior court," along with the date when the judgment was rendered and the court in which it was rendered, which entry shall be signed by the clerk of the superior court in which the judgment was rendered. Such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of such judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 449; Code 1933, § 87-306.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Statutes do not require any particular form or any specific statement in bonds issued by any county. Touchton v. Echols County, 211 Ga. 85, 84 S.E.2d 81 (1954).

No mandamus to certify instrument not in conformity. - It is the duty of the clerk of the superior court to sign a validation certificate and attach the seal of the clerk's office to all county bonds regularly validated. The law contemplates, however, that a certification by the clerk shall speak the truth, and the clerk may not be required by a mandamus, or otherwise, to certify an instrument that does not conform to the records in the clerk's office. Touchton v. Echols County, 211 Ga. 85, 84 S.E.2d 81 (1954).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2168.

36-82-26. Payment of costs of judicial validation proceedings.

Statute text

The costs of the proceedings shall be paid in any event by the county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to issue the bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 7; Civil Code 1910, § 451; Code 1933, § 87-307.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 376.

36-82-27. Procedure upon failure of district attorney or Attorney General to file petition with superior court generally.

Statute text

When any county, municipality, or political subdivision of the state has held an election for the issuance of bonds and notice has been duly served on the district attorney or the Attorney General under authority of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision, for the purpose of securing a judicial validation of such bonds, but the district attorney or Attorney General has failed to proceed within the time specified by Code Section 36-82-21, it shall be competent for the county, municipality, or other political subdivision to represent such facts in writing to the court, and to represent further that the failure has been without fault on the part of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision. In such case it shall be the duty of the court and it shall have the power and authority to inquire into the facts and, upon being satisfied that the failure has not arisen from any fault or neglect on the part of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision, to issue an order authorizing and directing the district attorney or the Attorney General to proceed within ten days to file the petition authorized by Code Section 36-82-21. Thereafter, the proceedings shall be heard in the same manner as would have been followed had the petition been duly and promptly filed in the first instance.

History

(Ga. L. 1920, p. 110, § 1; Code 1933, § 87-308.)

36-82-28. Effect of judgment of validation upon failure to file petition.

Statute text

Where proceedings are had as provided in Code Section 36-82-27 and result in a judgment validating the bonds, the bonds shall be held and deemed to be as fully and completely validated to all intents and purposes as though the proceedings had been had originally as provided by law and the judgment of validation shall be finally and completely conclusive in like manner as is now provided by Code Section 36-82-25.

History

(Ga. L. 1920, p. 110, § 2; Code 1933, § 87-309.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 373 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

——————————

PART 2

VALIDATION BY HOLDER OF BONDS ISSUED BY COUNTIES OR MUNICIPALITIES SUBSEQUENT TO ADOPTION OF CONSTITUTION OF 1877

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Estoppel of municipal corporation or other political subdivision by recitals in its bonds to dispute their validity as affected by the character of the owner of bonds as an original holder or a transferee, 86 A.L.R. 1129.

36-82-40. Authorization and procedure generally.

Statute text

The holder of any outstanding bond or bonds of any county, municipality, or political subdivision in this state issued subsequently to the adoption of the Constitution of 1877, the validating of which is not otherwise provided for by Code Sections 36-82-1 through 36-82-6 and Part 1 of this article, shall have the right to have the same validated in the manner provided in this part.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 453; Code 1933, § 87-401.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article discussing the impact on bond issues of challenges to voting procedures, see 15 Ga. St. B. J. 15 (1978).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity, within authorized debt, tax, or voted limit, of bond issue in excess of amount permitted by law, 175 A.L.R. 823.

36-82-41. Furnishing of indemnity bond by holder.

Statute text

The holder of any bond or bonds described in Code Section 36-82-40 who desires to have the same validated shall first enter into an obligation with sufficient security to indemnify the county, municipality, or political subdivision issuing the bond or bonds desired to be validated against all court costs and other expenses incident to the validating proceedings, the sufficiency of the surety on such obligation to be approved by the executive officer or officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 454; Code 1933, § 87-402.)

36-82-42. Petition by holder to district attorney or Attorney General.

Statute text

The holder of any bond or bonds described in Code Sections 36-82-40 and 36-82-41, having given indemnity against cost, may present to the district attorney of the circuit in which the county, municipality, or political subdivision which issued such bond or bonds is located or to the Attorney General in the event the district attorney is absent from the circuit, a petition setting forth a description of the bond or bonds sought to be validated, stating the date of issue, the rate of interest, the number and denomination of all bonds issued, and the time and place for payment of principal and interest, with a full copy of all resolutions and other proceedings authorizing the issue of the bonds, and indicating any and all other facts showing the authority of the county, municipality, or political subdivision to issue such bonds and the purpose for which they were issued.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 455; Code 1933, § 87-403.)

36-82-43. Petition by district attorney or Attorney General to superior court; order to show cause; service of petition and order; answer.

Statute text

Within 20 days from the date on which the petition of the holder of any bond or bonds is presented to the district attorney or to the Attorney General such officer shall prepare and file, in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county which issued the bonds or in the county in which the municipality or political subdivision which issued the bonds is located, a petition directed to the superior court of the county, in the name of the state and against the county, municipality, or political subdivision issuing the bonds, setting forth all the facts stated in the petition presented to him as provided in Code Section 36-82-42, the name of the county, municipality, or political subdivision which issued the bonds, the amount of bonds issued, for what purpose they were issued, a full description of the bonds, the authority under which they were issued, and the number of outstanding bonds. He shall obtain from the judge of the superior court of the county an order requiring the county, municipality, or political subdivision to show cause, by the proper officer or officers, at such time and place within 20 days from the filing of the petition as the judge of the court may direct, why the bonds described in the petition should not be confirmed and validated. The petition and order shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of petitions upon counties, municipalities, or political subdivisions. The officer or officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision shall make sworn answer to the petition within the time prescribed.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 456; Code 1933, § 87-404.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

When place of hearing fixed in another county, judgment a nullity. - When the judge of the superior court of the county in which the bonds were to be issued, upon a petition filed by the solicitor general (now district attorney) fixed the place of hearing at a point in another county, giving notice of the time and place of hearing, the court was without jurisdiction to pass judgment validating the bonds, and a judgment validating the bonds was a mere nullity. Tyson v. McIntosh County, 147 Ga. 233, 93 S.E. 407 (1917).

Affidavit by one member of board of education sufficient for petition. - When a petition to validate bonds to be issued by a county board of education is filed by the solicitor general (now district attorney), it is not necessary that the answer to such petition by the board of education, required by this section, be sworn to by each member of the board, but the affidavit of one member of the board is sufficient. King v. County Bd. of Educ., 42 Ga. App. 563, 156 S.E. 710 (1931), aff'd by operation of law, 174 Ga. 685, 164 S.E. 52 (1932).

Cited in King v. County Bd. of Educ., 174 Ga. 685, 164 S.E. 52 (1932).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 358, 360, 379, 380.

36-82-44. Hearing and judgment; parties to proceedings; appeal.

Statute text

Within the time prescribed in the order or such further time as he may fix, the judge of the superior court shall proceed to hear and determine all questions of law and fact in the case and shall render judgment thereon. Any citizen of this state who is resident in the county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to issue the bonds may become a party to the proceedings at or before the time set for the hearing. Any party thereto who is dissatisfied with the judgment of the court confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds or refusing to confirm and validate the issuance of the bonds may appeal from the judgment under the procedure provided by law in cases of injunction. Only a party to the proceedings at the time the judgment appealed from is rendered may appeal from the judgment.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 457; Code 1933, § 87-405; Ga. L. 1946, p. 726, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 279, § 5; Ga. L. 1966, p. 76, § 4.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 366 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-45. Effect of judgment of validation.

Statute text

If no appeal is filed within the time prescribed by law or if an appeal is filed and the judgment is affirmed on appeal, the judgment of the superior court confirming and validating the bonds shall be forever conclusive upon the validity of the bonds against the county, municipality, or political subdivision.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 458; Code 1933, § 87-406; Ga. L. 1966, p. 76, § 5.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 373 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-46. Applicability of Code Sections 36-82-22 and 36-82-25.

Statute text

Code Sections 36-82-22 and 36-82-25, providing for a notice of proceeding to validate and proof of validation, are made applicable in all proceedings to validate bonds under Code Sections 36-82-40 through 36-82-45.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 7; Civil Code 1910, § 459; Code 1933, § 87-407.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-47. Payment of costs of proceedings.

Statute text

All the costs of the proceedings shall be paid by the holder or holders requesting the validation of the bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 8; Civil Code 1910, § 460; Code 1933, § 87-408.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 376.

——————————

ARTICLE 3

REVENUE BONDS

Annotations

Cross references. - Constitutional provisions, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI.

Law reviews. - For article discussing extraterritorial provision of utility services by municipality, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1977).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Contracts

Specific Projects

Procedure

General Consideration

Courts bound by constitutional provision. - Under Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), the grant of such broad powers to municipalities as are contained in the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) is authorized, and by that the courts are bound and have nothing to do with the reasonableness, wisdom, policy, or expediency of the law. Lipscomb v. Cumming, 211 Ga. 55, 84 S.E.2d 3 (1954).

Issuance of bonds not unconstitutional. - When it appeared that revenue anticipation bonds were to be issued by a town for improvement of waterworks under the authority and in accordance with the method prescribed by Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), and the laws incorporated therein by reference thereto, the proposed issuance of the revenue anticipation bonds, the proceeding for validation, and the judgment of validation were not contrary to any provisions of the Constitution. Thigpen v. Town of Davisboro, 81 Ga. App. 610, 59 S.E.2d 522 (1950).

Acts restricting rights granted under article inoperative. - Since the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), adopted in Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), is a part of the charter of every municipality, any acts of the General Assembly tending to restrict the power of a municipality to exercise rights granted thereunder are inoperative for this purpose. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) sets out general law by which counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions may raise revenue for projects contemplated. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) does not purport to be general law exhaustive of purposes for which revenue bonds or certificates may be issued and this is not violative of the Constitutional provision that laws of a general nature shall have uniform operation throughout the state, and no special law shall be enacted in any case for which provisions have been made by an existing general law (Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I)). Sigman v. Brunswick Port Auth., 214 Ga. 332, 104 S.E.2d 467 (1958).

Effect of contradictory local legislation. - General Assembly intended that every municipality should have exactly the same power to do all of the acts authorized by the Revenue Bond Law of 1937 (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) as adopted by Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), and the constitutional provisions being a part of the charter of a municipality, it necessarily follows that it has the authority to proceed thereunder regardless of other and alternate, or even contradictory, plans which might have been contained in local legislation. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Article is part of municipal charter. - When the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) and the Constitution of 1945 were adopted, the provisions of each as to revenue bonds became a part of the charter of every municipality. Lipscomb v. Cumming, 211 Ga. 55, 84 S.E.2d 3 (1954); Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Certificates not debts within constitutional limitations. - Revenue anticipation bonds issued under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) do not subject the political subdivision issuing the bonds to any pecuniary liability thereon and are, therefore, not debts against such political subdivision within the meaning of the constitutional provision limiting such indebtedness (Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I)). Fort Oglethorpe v. Catoosa County, 80 Ga. App. 188, 55 S.E.2d 753 (1949).

Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) is designed to provide for self-liquidating projects and revenue bonds therein contemplated are not to be a charge against the general credit of the county or municipality. The liability is to be satisfied only from revenues produced by the undertaking and, under the specific terms of the statute, the political division will never be required to aid in its retirement with funds derived from any other source, and is in fact prohibited from doing so. Reed v. City of Smyrna, 201 Ga. 228, 39 S.E.2d 668 (1946).

Origin of funds as affecting public or private status. - Fact that the funds proposed to be used are to be derived from the sale of revenue anticipation bonds does not deprive the funds of the character of "public funds," use of which for private purpose or enterprise is prohibited. Beazley v. De Kalb County, 210 Ga. 41, 77 S.E.2d 740 (1953).

Cited in Dade County v. State, 201 Ga. 241, 39 S.E.2d 473 (1946); Findley v. City of Vidalia, 78 Ga. App. 581, 51 S.E.2d 542 (1949); McLucas v. State Bridge Bldg. Auth., 210 Ga. 1, 77 S.E.2d 531 (1953); Messenheimer v. Windt, 211 Ga. 575, 87 S.E.2d 402 (1955); Carter v. State, 211 Ga. 824, 89 S.E.2d 175 (1955); Merritt v. State, 95 Ga. App. 612, 98 S.E.2d 242 (1957); Southern Airways Co. v. De Kalb County, 216 Ga. 358, 116 S.E.2d 602 (1960); Smith v. Hayes, 217 Ga. 94, 121 S.E.2d 113 (1961); Couch v. City of Villa Rica, 203 F. Supp. 897 (N.D. Ga. 1962); Mays v. State, 110 Ga. App. 881, 140 S.E.2d 223 (1965); Rich v. State, 237 Ga. 291, 227 S.E.2d 761 (1976); Krause v. City of Brunswick, 242 Ga. 659, 251 S.E.2d 239 (1978); Reed v. State, 265 Ga. 458, 458 S.E.2d 113 (1995).

Contracts

Provisions of the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) did not render meaningless the mandate of former Code 1933, § 69-202 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-30-3), forbidding councils from binding their successors. The express statutory authority for a municipality to contract with the bondholders as to specified future utility rates did not extend to contracts with the wholesaler of electrical power. Johnson v. State, 107 Ga. App. 16, 128 S.E.2d 651 (1962).

Covenants against disposing of undertaking enforceable. - Covenants against leasing or otherwise disposing of an undertaking, revenues of which were pledged in accordance with the contract between a governing authority and its bondholders under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), constitute a contract between such governing body and each bondholder which was enforceable by the latter under the provisions of Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 6 ( see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-65). Hicks v. State, 99 Ga. App. 302, 108 S.E.2d 187 (1959).

Specific Projects

Creation of water district and system outside city approved. - Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) defines a "municipality" (now "governmental body") to be any county, city, or town. It authorizes any such municipality to create a water district and to construct, operate, and maintain a water system which may be located wholly within or wholly without the municipality, or partially within and partially without the municipality. City of Trenton v. Dade County, 75 Ga. App. 326, 43 S.E.2d 432 (1947).

No cause of action to enjoin city from furnishing water outside city limits. - Petition which seeks to enjoin city from constructing a water line and furnishing water to customers because the customers are located outside the corporate limits of the city fails to state a cause of action. Lipscomb v. Cumming, 211 Ga. 55, 84 S.E.2d 3 (1954).

Bonds issued to extend existing system of improvements approved. - Under the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) and the constitutional sanction thereof (Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I)), revenue anticipation bonds may be issued by a municipality to extend an existing system of municipal improvements by pledging the entire revenue of the whole system to the payment thereof, subject to the rights of holders of prior issues, without prorating the values of the existing and the new facilities, and pledging only the revenue of such new facilities according to their proportion to the total value. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Government center and retardation center bonds confirmed and validated. See Building Auth. v. State, 253 Ga. 242, 321 S.E.2d 97 (1984).

Issuing certificates for construction of warehouse not authorized. - Under the restrictive provisions of Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), that governmental subdivisions of the state shall issue revenue anticipation bonds only to provide funds for such facilities and undertakings as are "specifically authorized and enumerated" by Acts there referred to, a county is not authorized to issue such revenue bonds for the acquisition or construction and equipping of warehouses to be used in the conduct of a general storage warehouse business, which is ordinarily carried on by private enterprise. Such an undertaking is not properly included within the definition of the word "terminal" as used in the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), and not "specifically authorized and enumerated" therein. Beazley v. De Kalb County, 210 Ga. 41, 77 S.E.2d 740 (1953).

Contract with engineering company not payable from general funds. - Liability against a municipality arising out of and by virtue of any contract made by such municipality with an engineering company, entered into pursuant to the provisions of Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), and the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), is not an indebtedness of the municipality which can be paid and satisfied out of the general tax fund or other general funds of the municipality. City of Royston v. Littrell Eng'r Co., 87 Ga. App. 903, 75 S.E.2d 678 (1953).

Procedure

Superior rights not gained by prior proceeding to validate certificates. - There is nothing contained in the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) which expressly or by necessary implication gives that municipality which institutes proceedings first for the validation of its bonds, and the confirmation of the security for the payment thereof, superior rights over another municipality which may file proceedings to validate and confirm the security for its bonds subsequently thereto; this is true although the two proposed districts may embrace the same area or portions of the same area. City of Trenton v. Dade County, 75 Ga. App. 326, 43 S.E.2d 432 (1947).

Conclusiveness of judgment validating revenue bonds. - Judgment validating revenue bonds, unless excepted to within the time provided by law, is conclusive upon all questions made, or that might have been made, prior to the judgment of validation, including the constitutionality of the statute under which the proceedings are had. Dawson v. Hospital Auth., 212 Ga. 146, 91 S.E.2d 12 (1956).

Defect in service waived by appearance. - When the mayor and counsel of a municipality appear, file an answer, and acknowledge service of a petition for validating revenue bonds, any defect in the service of the petition on the mayor and counsel is held to be waived by appearance and pleading. Dade County v. State, 75 Ga. App. 330, 43 S.E.2d 434 (1947).

Written notice by attorney on solicitor general (now district attorney) sufficient. - When a municipality through the municipality's proper officers, under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), employs an attorney to guide and direct the municipality generally and to prepare proceedings for the purpose of validating revenue bonds, and such attorney prepares the resolution of the municipality and serves written notice of the passage of the resolution on the solicitor general (now district attorney), such will be deemed sufficient notice to the solicitor general (now district attorney). Dade County v. State, 75 Ga. App. 330, 43 S.E.2d 434 (1947).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eminent domain beyond corporate city limits. - Georgia municipalities have power of eminent domain, even beyond corporate city limits, for public works financed by revenue bonds. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U81-1.

Municipalities in business only to serve public welfare. - In the absence of special circumstances, it is not within the constitutional power of a legislature to authorize a municipal corporation (county) to engage in a business which can be and ordinarily is carried on by private enterprise, merely for the purpose of obtaining an income or deriving a profit therefrom, but it should be allowed to go into business only on the theory that thereby the public welfare will be subserved. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-176.

County cannot make donations to water and sewerage authority, but it can enter into contracts with such authority. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-225.

Athletic facilities approved. - Under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), the county board of education could erect athletic fields, grandstands, and stadiums with revenue bonds to be retired solely from the usage of the fields, grandstands, and stadiums. 1945-47 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 168.

Ambulance service. - County has no right, in absence of special or local legislation granting such right, to operate ambulance service. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-176.

Weight of advice of county attorney. - Before a county board of education should undertake to create a debt under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), the county board of education should advise with the county attorney and be governed according to the county attorney's advice and instruction. 1945-47 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 168.

36-82-60. Short title.

Statute text

This article may be cited as the "Revenue Bond Law."

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 36, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article discussing the impact on bond issues of challenges to voting procedures, see 15 Ga. St. B. J. 15 (1978).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - As applied to the establishment and maintenance of systems of waterworks by counties, the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) is not subject to attack on the ground that the law violates the constitutional provision that protection to person and property is the paramount duty of government, and shall be impartial and complete. Nor does the Constitution otherwise prohibit the General Assembly from authorizing such an undertaking by counties. The court did not err in denying an interlocutory injunction. Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938).
